California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
Nothing contained in this article shall limit in any manner the police power of any city with reference to any such street or portion of street improved under the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1704.

At any time after all or a portion of a city street becomes a county highway, as provided in this article, and all improvements commenced by the county, or its agents thereon, have been fully completed, the board of supervisors of such county may adopt a resolution declaring that all or any portion of such street is no longer a county highway. Ten days after the filing of such resolution with the clerk of the city within which the street lies, such street, or the portion thereof described in the resolution, shall cease to be a county highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

1705.

Whenever county bonds are voted or a special tax is levied for paving a county highway, and the natural course of such highway runs into or through any city, the board of supervisors shall pave within such city that portion of the highway which is designated by the chief executive of the city and the county supervisor in whose district such portion is located. Such highway portion shall be constructed to standards equal to those of the highway approaching such city. If such chief executive and such supervisor do not agree as to what street will be thus designated, then the chairman of the commission shall designate the street and his judgment shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1706.

Whenever a city permits a county to use the city streets and highways for the purpose of constructing and maintaining any highway or boulevard as part of a county system of roads pursuant to Section 1850, the board of supervisors may construct and maintain such bridge or bridges on such highway or boulevard within the city as it deems necessary, and may macadamize, pave, curb, or gutter, such highway or boulevard in such manner as it determines; and the cost or expense thereof shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cooperation Between Cities and Counties [1710. - 1712.]

1710.

A city and a county may agree that the city shall construct, repair and maintain designated county highways or portions thereof within the unincorporated territory of the county, the cost thereof to be paid by the county to the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 273.)
-------------------------------------------

1711.

A county and a city may agree that the county shall construct, repair or maintain designated county highways, or portions thereof, within the unincorporated territory of the county, the cost thereof to be paid in whole or in part by the city to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 446.)
-------------------------------------------

1712.

(a) A county and a city or cities may join in the acquisition of rights-of-way, construction, maintenance, improvement, or repair of bicycle routes or paths, or portions thereof, located within or without the city or cities.

(b) The cost or expense thereof shall be apportioned among the county and the city or cities as the legislative bodies thereof determine by agreement.

(c) The authority and responsibility for the acquisition and work shall vest in the county or in the city or cities, or in both, as provided in the agreement apportioning the cost or expense thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 67.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. County Highways Within Cities [1720. - 1732.]

1720.

This article provides an alternative procedure for the establishment of a county highway within a city. This article shall be applicable in those counties adopting a county highway bond issue after January 1, 1961.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1721.

The board of supervisors by resolution may determine that it is of general county interest that an existing street in the county extending in whole or in part within a city be made a county highway within the city or that a new county highway be laid out, acquired, constructed and maintained in whole or in part within a city. The resolution shall describe the proposed location or relocation and the general nature of construction proposed to be undertaken by the county. A copy of such resolution shall be forwarded to the governing body of the city within which is included any portion of the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1722.

The governing body of the city, by resolution, may consent to the establishment of the proposed county highway and may relinquish to the county in whole or in part an existing city street. If the governing body of the city wishes to change the location or relocation of the highway proposed by the board of supervisors, it may adopt a report describing the proposed revisions and file a copy with the board of supervisors. The board shall consider the report and may modify its resolution. If the board modifies its resolution it shall forward a copy of such resolution to the governing body of the city. The city may then adopt a resolution of consent to the modified county resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1723.

Upon the adoption of the resolution of consent by the city, such street or portion thereof within the city shall thereupon constitute a county highway. A certified copy of such resolution shall be filed with the board of supervisors. When the city council relinquishes an existing city street to the county, a certified copy of such resolution shall be recorded; and upon such recordation, all right, title and interest of the city in and to such portion of the city street shall vest in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1724.

Thereafter, the board of supervisors of the county may acquire, construct and maintain such highway as other county highways are acquired, constructed and maintained and may pay for such work out of one or more of the following:

(a) The proceeds of any county bond issue for county highway construction;

(b) The road fund;

(c) The county general fund;

(d) Any other funds available for county highway purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------

1725.

Whenever a county highway has been established within a city, as provided in this article, and an extension of such highway in the unincorporated area of the county is thereafter annexed by the city, the portion annexed shall continue to be a county highway until a resolution of relinquishment is adopted in accordance with Section 1731.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1726.

The county and city may agree that the city shall acquire, construct or maintain designated county highways or portions thereof within the city, the cost thereof to be paid by the county or the city or both agencies as may be agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1727.

The city may by agreement co-operate with the county in the acquisition, construction or maintenance of designated county highways or portions thereof within the city in one or more of the following ways:

(a) Contribute money or property;

(b) Acquire and deliver material;

(c) Furnish labor, legal or engineering services;

(d) Loan its highway equipment;

(e) Contribute money to be used for the payment of interest upon, or for the payment or redemption of bonds, the proceeds of which have been used for work on county highways within the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1728.

No city street shall be closed, either directly or indirectly, by the construction of a county highway within a city as a freeway except pursuant to an agreement between the city council and the board of supervisors or while temporarily necessary during construction operations. No city street or other public highway shall be opened into or connected with any county highway declared to be a freeway by the board of supervisors unless and until the board of supervisors adopts a resolution consenting to the same and fixing the terms and conditions on which such connection shall be made and the board of supervisors may give or withhold its consent or fix such terms and conditions as in its opinion will best serve the public interest.

The board of supervisors is authorized to enter into an agreement with the city council to close any city street at or near the point of its interception with any county highway declared to be a freeway under Section 941.1 or to make provision for carrying such city street over or under or to a connection with the freeway, and the board of supervisors may do any and all work on such city street as is necessary therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1729.

The police power of a city with reference to a county highway within the city shall not be limited except as to those matters specifically provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1730.

(a) No ordinance of a city relating to the stopping, standing or parking of a vehicle shall become effective as to a county highway established pursuant to this article within the city without prior submission to and approval by the board of supervisors. No city shall erect or maintain any stop sign, semaphore, or other traffic control signaling device in a manner that requires the traffic on any county highway established pursuant to this article within the city to stop before entering or crossing any intersecting street or any railroad grade crossing, without the permission of the board of supervisors.

(b) An ordinance adopted on or after January 1, 2005, by a county under Section 21960 of the Vehicle Code to prohibit or restrict pedestrian use of a portion of a county freeway or expressway contained within the limits of a city shall not become operative until approved by the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1731.

The board of supervisors, by resolution, may relinquish to the city a county highway or any portion thereof located within the city. A certified copy of such resolution shall be filed with the city council. A certified copy of such resolution shall also be recorded in the office of the county recorder, and upon recordation, all right, title and interest of the county in and to such portion of a county highway shall vest in the city, and such highway or portion thereof shall thereupon constitute a city street.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

1732.

County highways established pursuant to this article shall be included in the terms “maintained mileage of county roads” and “miles of maintained county road” as those terms are used in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. County Ferries [1750. - 1757.]

1750.

The boards of supervisors in their respective counties may maintain, control, construct, repair or manage public ferries within the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.

The boards of supervisors, in their respective counties, may construct, operate, manage or maintain summer ferries under such rules and regulations and at such times and places as they consider necessary. The boards may cause the expense of such ferries to be paid out of the county general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.

Whenever the board of supervisors of any county considers it advisable and for the best interests of the public that the county own and operate any ferry within such county, the board may purchase, establish or operate any ferry across any stream or river within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.

Such board may acquire landing places for any such ferry and may pay the expenses of purchasing, establishing or operating such ferry out of the road fund of the county. A supervisor or his bondsmen shall not be responsible for the payment of damages incurred by any person while traveling on such ferry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

1754.

When a navigable river forms a boundary between two counties of this State, the board of supervisors of such counties may establish and operate any ferry across such river.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1754.5.

When a navigable bay forms a boundary between two counties, the boards of supervisors of the counties may establish and operate any ferry across the bay, subject to any restrictions in Article 7 (commencing with Section 30350) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 or in any bond resolution of the commission which may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.

Each of the counties shall pay such proportion of the expenses of establishing and operating any such ferry as is agreed upon by the respective boards. Each board may pay its county’s proportion of such expenses out of the county general fund or the road fund of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

1756.

If either of the counties refuses to enter into an agreement to establish and operate any such ferry, the other county may:

(a) Establish and operate a ferry across the river.

(b) Acquire landing places for such ferry on the opposite bank of such river. 

(c) Pay the expense of establishing and operating such ferry out of the road fund or the county general fund of such county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.

Any ferry constructed or acquired under this chapter by a county or counties may be operated as either a free ferry or a toll ferry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2.5. CITY STREETS [1800. - 1967.11.]



CHAPTER 1. Construction and Maintenance [1800. - 1813.]

1800.

The legislative body of any city may do any and all things necessary to lay out, acquire, and construct any section or portion of any street or highway within its jurisdiction as a freeway, and to make any existing street or highway a freeway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.

The legislative body of any city may close any street or highway within its jurisdiction at or near the point of its intersection with any freeway, or may make provision for carrying such street or highway over, under, or to a connection with the freeway, and may do any and all necessary work on such street or highway.

No public highway shall be converted into a freeway except with the consent of the owners of abutting lands or the purchase or condemnation of their right of access thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.

Before taking any action authorized by Section 1801 affecting any state highway, the action shall require the approval of the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 80.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.

Whenever the legislative body of a city determines that it is necessary for the more efficient maintenance, construction, or repair of streets and roads within the city it may contract with the board of supervisors of any county for the rental, by the city, of such county’s equipment for the maintenance, construction, or repair of such streets and roads, or for the maintenance, construction, or repair of such streets and roads by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.

Every city in the state may construct, maintain, and operate tunnels for street and highway purposes within and without the territorial boundaries of the city. As to any such tunnels on state highways, the approval of the Department of Transportation shall first be obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 80.9.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.

The width of all city streets, except state highways, bridges, alleys, and trails, shall be at least 40 feet, except that the governing body of any city may, by a resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of its membership, determine that the public convenience and necessity demand the acquisition, construction and maintenance of a street of less than 40 feet and, after such determination, proceed with the acquisition, construction or maintenance of any such street. The width of all private highways and by-roads, except bridges, shall be at least 20 feet. This section does not require that the width of city streets established or used as such prior to September 15, 1935, be increased or diminished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 569.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.5.

On construction under a contract advertised for bids after July 1, 1973, the legislative body of a city shall install on the surfaces of city streets upon which the operation of bicycles is permitted only those types of grates which are not hazardous to bicycle riders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.

(a) No city shall be held liable for failure to maintain any road until it has been accepted into the city street system in accordance with subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) Except as provided by Section 989, or by Section 57329 or 57385 of the Government Code, no public or private street or road shall become a city street or road until the governing body, by resolution, has caused the street or road to be accepted into the city street system.

(c) In lieu of the procedure set forth in subdivision (b), the governing body of a city may, by ordinance, designate a city officer to accept, on behalf of the governing body, streets and roads or portions thereof, into the city street system and to record conveyances to the city of real property interests for street and road uses and purposes. The designee shall, prior to recording any conveyance under this section, affix a certificate to the instrument stating the acceptance into the city street system and designating the name or number, or both, of the city street or road.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.

Where the boundary line between two adjacent cities is a street, and the boundary line itself is in the middle of such street, or the side of such street, the two adjacent cities, if authorized by their governing bodies, may enter into a mutual agreement for the improvement and maintenance of the street which constitutes the boundary line, and each city may, pursuant to such agreement, expend funds available to it for the improvement and maintenance of its city streets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.

Where practical or desirable, the legislative body of any city shall, along any street or highway under its jurisdiction, possession, or control, replace trees that have been destroyed or removed because of projects undertaken to widen the street or highway.

Money received by a city from the Highway Users Tax Fund available for the widening of streets or highways is also available for the planting of trees pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1060.)
-------------------------------------------

1809.

Before any bridge on a city street is constructed over any navigable river, the legislative body of the city, after a study and public hearing on the question, shall determine and shall prepare a report on the feasibility of providing public access to the river for recreational purposes and a determination as to whether such public access shall be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 972.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.

A city may acquire, by purchase or eminent domain, property outside its boundaries in the unincorporated area of the county in which the city is located, if it is necessary to connect or widen the existing streets of the acquiring city and if the county consents to the acquisition.

The portion of the acquired property used to connect or widen a city street shall be deemed a city street for all purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.5.

Survey monuments shall be preserved, referenced, or replaced pursuant to Section 8771 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 458, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1811.

(a) A city with a population of 2,000,000 or more shall not reduce the number of vehicle travel lanes on a street that provides the only access to two or more adjacent cemeteries without prior approval of the governing body and the concurrence of the mayor of the city.

(b) Prior to approval of a reduction in the number of vehicle travel lanes pursuant to subdivision (a), the governing body of the city shall do both of the following:

(1) Conduct a duly noticed public hearing regarding the proposed vehicle travel lane reduction.

(2) Consider and make written findings regarding all of the following:

(A) Whether there are alternatives that would allow for proposed street modification without a vehicle travel lane reduction.

(B) The impact of the vehicle travel lane reduction on emergency access to the cemeteries and the surrounding community.

(C) The impact of the vehicle travel lane reduction on emergency response to very high and high fire hazard severity zones.

(D) Consistency of the proposed street modification with the city’s adopted mobility plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 260, Sec. 2.   (SB 194)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the City of South Lake Tahoe may complete construction of the loop road from city funds, including preparation of any necessary environmental impact reports and securing any necessary approval of the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 463, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1813.

(a) The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1160) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 for the construction or maintenance of county roads may be utilized within any city for the construction and maintenance of city streets. For the purpose of construction or maintenance of city streets under this section, all references in that Article 3 to counties and their officers and to county funds, taxes, and service charges shall be deemed to be references to cities, city officers, and city funds, taxes, and service charges.

(b) The legislative body of any city may consent to the inclusion within a permanent road division formed by a county of streets within the corporate limits of the city, and the board of supervisors of the county in which the city is located shall then have jurisdiction over all proceedings taken or to be taken under that Article 3 in the same manner and to the same extent as if the city streets were county roads.

(c) This section is an alternative to any other provision of law that provides for the construction or maintenance of city streets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 780, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. City Streets as Part of the State and County Highway Systems [1850. - 1852.]

1850.

Any city may, by ordinance or resolution, permit the use of its streets and highways by the board of supervisors of the county, for the purpose of constructing and maintaining thereon any highway or boulevard, as part of a county system of roads within any portion of its incorporated limits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

1851.

The legislative body of any city may establish the grades of those portions of any county highway lying within the city boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1852.

No city shall change the grade of any portion of a state or county highway where such grade has been established prior to the incorporation of the city, without first obtaining the written consent of the State or county authorities, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Assessment Relief [1900. - 1903.]

1900.

If the legislative body of a city by a resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of its members, determines that any improvement of streets within the boundaries of the city is of more than local benefit and that the assessments levied against the property fronting on the street improvement or in the assessment district are unjust and in excess of the benefits derived from the improvement, public money may be appropriated to reduce such assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

A resolution to reduce assessments pursuant to this chapter shall refer to the improvement as designated in the assessment proceedings, state the amount of money to be appropriated and the fund or funds from which it is to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.

Appropriations may be made pursuant to this chapter for the following purposes:

(a) To reduce special assessments and special assessment bonds levied and issued against real property fronting upon the public improvement or in the district estimated to have been benefited thereby.

(b) For the payment of any portion of the principal or interest of, or for the purchase and redemption at a discount of, or the transfer to the interest and sinking fund for the discharge and payment of bonds, the proceeds of which have been used for the acquisition of rights of way or easements for, or for the construction, maintenance, improvement, or repair of streets, bridges, or culverts within the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

1903.

An appropriation under this chapter may be made from any fund of the city which may be used for the construction, maintenance, improvement, or repair of streets, or for the acquisition of rights of way therefor, or from any other fund available for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Removal From Public Use and Maintenance [1920. - 1921.]

1920.

When the governing body of a city by resolution or ordinance removes a street from public use, or closes it to vehicular or pedestrian traffic, such resolution or ordinance may set forth such minimum maintenance requirements, including the maintenance of drainage, for the street as the governing body determines are necessary for the public safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1921.

The governing body of any city shall have jurisdiction to prescribe the requirements for maintenance, including the maintenance of drainage, of all streets within the limits of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Golf Cart Transportation Plan [1950. - 1961.]

1950.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to authorize any city or county to establish a golf cart transportation plan for a plan area in the city or county. It is the further intent of the Legislature that this transportation plan be designed and developed to best serve the functional travel needs of the plan area, to have the physical safety of the golf cart driver’s person and property as a major planning component, and to have the capacity to accommodate golf cart drivers of every legal age and range of skills.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 334, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.

The following definitions apply to this chapter:

(a) “Plan area” means that territory under the jurisdiction of a city or county designated by the city or county for a golf cart transportation plan, including the privately owned land of any owner that consents to its inclusion in the plan.

(b) “Golf cart” means a motor vehicle having not less than three wheels in contact with the ground and unladen weight less than 1,300 pounds which is designed to be and is operated at not more than 25 miles per hour and is designated to carry golf equipment and not more than two persons, including the driver.

(c) “Golf cart lanes” means all publicly owned facilities that provide for golf cart travel including roadways designated by signs or permanent markings which are shared with pedestrians, bicyclists, and other motorists in the plan area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 334, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1953.

(a) A city or county may, by ordinance or resolution, adopt a golf cart transportation plan.

(b) The transportation plan shall have received a prior review and the comments of the appropriate transportation planning agency designated under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 29532 of the Government Code and any agency having traffic law enforcement responsibilities in that city or county.

(c) The transportation plan shall not include the use of any state highway, or any portion thereof, except that a crossing of, or a golf cart lane along, a state highway may be included in the plan, if authorized by the department and the law enforcement agency having primary traffic enforcement responsibility of that highway or portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1955.

The transportation plan shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following elements:

(a) Route selection, which includes a finding that the route will accommodate golf carts without an adverse impact upon traffic safety, and will consider, among other things, the travel needs of commuters and other users.

(b) Transportation interfacing, which shall include, but not be limited to, coordination with other modes of transportation so that a golf cart driver may employ multiple modes of transportation in reaching a destination in the plan area.

(c) Citizens and community involvement in planning.

(d) Flexibility and coordination with long-range transportation planning. 

(e) Provision for golf cart related facilities including, but not limited to, special access points and golf cart crossings.

(f) Provisions for parking facilities, including, but not limited to, community commercial centers, golf courses, public areas, parks, and other destination locations.

(g) Provisions for special paving, road markings, signage and striping for golf cart travel lanes, road crossings, parking, and circulation.

(h) No adopted transportation plan shall include the establishment of a golf cart lane along, or that cross, a state highway unless authorized by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1957.

(a) If a city or county adopts a golf cart transportation plan, it shall do both of the following:

(1) Establish minimum general design criteria for the development, planning, and construction of separated golf cart lanes, including, but not limited to, the design speed of the facility, the space requirements of the golf cart, and roadway design criteria.

(2) In cooperation with the department, establish uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices to control golf cart traffic; to warn of dangerous conditions, obstacles, or hazards; to designate the right-of-way as between golf carts, other vehicles, and bicycles; to state
 the nature and destination of the golf cart lane; and to warn pedestrians, bicyclists, and motorists of the presence of golf cart traffic.

(b) The construction of separated golf cart lanes, as required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), does not apply in any of the following locations:

(1) A residence district, as defined in Section 515 of the Vehicle Code, located within any city containing a population of less than 50,000 residents with a geographical area of more than 20 square miles in which city there are at least 20 golf courses, if the speed limit in that district is 25 miles per hour or less.

(2) (A) The City of La Verne, on those street and highway segments for which the city council makes a finding that the street or highway segment is suitable to safely permit the use of regular
 vehicular traffic and also the driving of golf carts, and makes a separate finding that the construction of separated golf cart lanes is infeasible given the physical space limitations of the street or highway segment. In addition, these street or highway segments shall meet all of the following requirements:

(i) Have speed limits of 25 miles per hour or less, as established by an engineering and traffic survey.

(ii) Be immediately adjacent to or surrounded by the campus of a university or a retirement community.

(iii) Provide a route between unconnected portions of the campus of a university or the real property of a retirement community, or provide direct access to an otherwise inaccessible portion of the campus of a university or the real property of a retirement community.

(iv) Be approved for purposes of this paragraph by the law enforcement agency with primary traffic jurisdiction over the street or highway segments.

(v) Accommodate golf carts without adversely impacting traffic safety or the travel needs of commuters and other users, according to a safety determination made by a traffic engineer.

(vi) Be limited to golf carts owned by the university or retirement community and equipped with a windshield, headlights, brake lights, and seatbelts.

(vii) Limit the use of golf carts to employees of the university or retirement community acting within the scope and course of employment for the maintenance or security of the university or the retirement community.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 1951 of this code and Section 345 of the Vehicle Code, for purposes of this paragraph, “golf cart” includes, but is not limited to, a utility style golf cart, used for transporting maintenance equipment, and a shuttle style golf cart.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   (AB 2073)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1959.

A city or county that adopts a golf cart transportation plan may do the following:

(a) Acquire, by dedication, purchase, or condemnation, real property, including easements or rights-of-way, to establish golf cart lanes.

(b) Establish a golf cart transportation plan as authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 334, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1961.

A city or county that adopts a golf cart transportation plan shall adopt all of the following as part of the plan:

(a) Minimum design criteria for golf carts, that may include, but not be limited to, headlights, turn signals, safety devices, mirrors, brake lights, windshields, and other devices. The criteria may include requirements for seatbelts and a covered passenger compartment.

(b) A permit process for golf carts that requires permitted golf carts to meet minimum design criteria adopted pursuant to subdivision (a). The permit process may include, but not be limited to, permit posting, permit renewal, operator education, and other related matters.

(c) Minimum safety criteria for golf cart operators, including, but not limited to, requirements relating to golf cart maintenance and golf cart safety. Operators shall be required to possess a valid California driver’s license and to comply with the financial responsibility requirements established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 7.

(d) (1) Restrictions limiting the operation of golf carts to separated golf cart lanes on those roadways identified in the transportation plan, and allowing only those golf carts that have been retrofitted with the safety equipment specified in the plan to be operated on separated golf cart lanes of approved roadways in the plan area.

(2) Any person operating a golf cart in the plan area in violation of this subdivision is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Neighborhood Electric Vehicle Transportation Plans [1965. - 1966.17.]



  ARTICLE 1. Ranch Plan Planned Community in the County of Orange [1965. - 1965.6.]

1965.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to authorize the County of Orange to establish a neighborhood electric vehicle (NEV) transportation plan for the Ranch Plan Planned Community in the county. The purpose of this NEV transportation plan is to further the community’s vision of creating a sustainable development that reduces gasoline demand and vehicle emissions by offering a cleaner, more economical means of local transportation within the plan area. It is the further intent of the Legislature that this NEV transportation plan be designed and developed to best serve the functional travel needs of the plan area, to have the physical safety of the NEV driver’s person and property as a major planning component, and to have the capacity to accommodate NEV drivers of every legal age and range of skills.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.1.

The following definitions apply to this chapter:

(a) “Plan area” means the Ranch Plan Planned Community project area and all streets located within the project area.

(b) “Neighborhood electric vehicle” or “NEV” means a low-speed vehicle as defined by Section 385.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) “NEV lanes” means all publicly or privately owned facilities that provide for NEV travel including roadways designated by signs or permanent markings which are shared with pedestrians, bicyclists, and other motorists in the plan area.
